Rhode Island, session 2025, HB5879.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 28-5 of the General Laws entitled "Fair Employment Practices" is
hereby amended by adding thereto the following section:
28-5-7.5. Addressing antisemitic discrimination.
(a) As used in this section the term:
(1) "Antisemitism" has the same meaning as provided for in the working definition of
antisemitism adopted by the International Holocaust Remembrance Alliance (IHRA) on May 26,
2016, including the "contemporary examples of antisemitism," and as incorporated by reference in
Presidential Executive Order Number 13899, 84 F.R. 68779 December 11, 2019. Discriminatory
practices based upon race, religion, and country of ancestral origin shall include acts of
antisemitism throughout the Rhode Island general laws.
(2) "Government" means and includes a branch, department, agency, instrumentality,
political subdivision, official, or other person acting under color of state law.
(3) "State law" means and includes without limitation a state law or ordinance of a political
subdivision.
(b) In reviewing, investigating, or determining whether there has been a violation of any
relevant policy, law, or rule prohibiting discriminatory acts, the government shall take into
consideration the definition of "antisemitism" in this section for purposes of determining whether
the alleged act was motivated by discriminatory antisemitic intent.
(c) A court or other relevant authority shall apply the same legal standard to a claim of

discrimination because of antisemitism as applicable to claims of discrimination arising under state
laws protecting civil rights.
(d) For the purposes of training of state personnel related to discrimination and anti-bias
training, the definition of "antisemitism" contained in this section shall be used as an educational
tool to familiarize state officials with identifying and addressing antisemitism.
(e) Nothing in this section shall be construed to:
(1) Diminish or infringe upon any right protected under the First Amendment to the United
States Constitution or the Rhode Island Constitution; or
(2) Conflict with federal law or state law concerning discrimination.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC001603
========
LC001603 - Page 2 of 3